Utah statutes.
39-1-7.   Muster of unorganized militia.

Members of the unorganized militia called into the service of this state shall be mustered into service for such a period, not to exceed the period of one enlistment in the National Guard, as the governor shall deem necessary. Militia so mustered into service shall be organized into units as provided by the rules and regulations governing the regular army of the United States, or as otherwise provided by law.

